Utah statutes.
57-20-1.   Rent and fee control prohibition.
(1)  A county, city, or town may not enact an ordinance or resolution that
would control rents or fees on private residential property unless it has the
express approval of the Legislature.
(2)  This section does not impair the right of a state agency, county, city,
or town to enforce its zoning, building, and planning authority.
